Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 15
COLORADO EDUCATIONAL AND CULTURAL
FACILITIES AUTHORITY

Section

23-15-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Educational and Cultural Facilities Authority Act".

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 601, § 1, effective May 4.

23-15-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

It is the intent of the general assembly to create the Colorado educational and cultural facilities authority to lend money to educational institutions and cultural institutions; to authorize the authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, repair, alter, improve, extend, own, lease, and dispose of properties to the end that the authority may be able to promote the welfare of the people of this state; to authorize the authority to administer the Colorado education savings program; to permit the bonds or certificates of participation of the authority and the bonds or certificates of participation of other issuers to be designated as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates; and to vest such authority with powers to enable such authority to accomplish such purposes. It is not the intent of the general assembly to authorize the authority to operate any such educational or cultural facility.

It is important that educational facilities and cultural facilities are made readily available by networks and organizations of educational institutions and cultural institutions regardless of whether such networks and organizations are located within the state of Colorado or have facilities located within or outside the state of Colorado; and

It is a benefit to the people of the state of Colorado to serve multistate educational institutions and cultural institutions since education-related and cultural-related employment opportunities in this state will be created as a result thereof.

This article shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intentions expressed in this section.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1) amended, p. 849, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 89:

(1) amended, p. 986, § 1, effective April 8; (1) amended, p. 982, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 601, § 1, effective May 4.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 403, § 1, effective April 13.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1) in Senate Bill 89-206 and House Bill 89-1049 were harmonized.

23-15-103. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Authority" means the Colorado educational and cultural facilities authority created by this article.

"Board" means the board of directors of the authority.

"Bond", "note", "bond anticipation note", "certificate of participation", or "other obligation" means any bond, note, certificate of participation in annually renewable leases, debenture, interim certificate, or other evidence of financial indebtedness issued by the authority pursuant to this article or issued by another issuer pursuant to other statutory authority, including refunding bonds.

"Bond resolution" means the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or providing terms and conditions related to, bonds issued under the provisions of this article and includes any trust agreement, trust indenture, indenture of mortgage, or deed of trust providing terms and conditions for such bonds.

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education.

"Costs", as applied to facilities financed in whole or in part under the provisions of this article, means and includes the sum total of all reasonable or necessary costs incidental to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, alteration, equipment, enlargement, improvement, and extension of such facilities and the acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and interest acquired, necessary, used for, or useful for or in connection with a facility and all other undertakings which the authority deems reasonable or necessary for the development of a facility, including without limitation the cost of studies and surveys, of land title and mortgage guaranty policies, of plans, specifications, and architectural and engineering services, of legal, accounting, organization, marketing, or other special services, of financing, acquisition, demolition, construction, equipment, and site development of new and rehabilitated buildings, of rehabilitation, reconstruction, repair, or remodeling of existing buildings, and of all other necessary and incidental expenses, including working capital, an initial bond, and interest reserve funds, together with interest on bonds issued to finance such facilities until a date not more than six months subsequent to the estimated date of completion.

(6.3) (a) "Cultural institution" means any governmental, quasi-governmental, or nonprofit institution that engages in cultural, intellectual, scientific, educational, or artistic enrichment. "Cultural institution" includes, without limitation, any aquarium, botanical society, educational society, historical society, library, museum, gallery, performing arts association or society, nonprofit sports association, committee, or governing body, scientific society, natural history society or organization, zoological society, society for western history and western culture, sponsor of housing facilities that serve the cultural needs of their residents, and any private nonprofit foundation, nonprofit association, or other entity that is organized principally for the support and benefit of any of the foregoing.

"Cultural institution" also includes any governmental, quasi-governmental, or nonprofit institution, corporation, association, or organization that, through one or more affiliates, directly or indirectly engages in cultural, intellectual, scientific, educational, or artistic enrichment in this state or outside this state if:

Such institution, corporation, association, or organization, or an affiliate of such an entity, is engaged in a financing or refinancing on behalf of a facility within this state or outside of this state; and

Such institution, corporation, association, or organization, or an affiliate of such an entity, operates a cultural facility within this state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2055, § 1, effective May 22, 2003.)

(6.5) "Deep discount" means any obligation for which the original purchase price is substantially less than the par amount paid upon maturity.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 1496, § 31, effective June 1, 2006.)

"Educational institution" means any governmental, quasi-governmental, or nonprofit educational institution operating in this state that:

Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's degree; or

Provides not less than a two-year program which is acceptable for full credit towards such a degree; or

Provides not less than a six-month program of training to prepare students for gainful employment; or

Provides not less than a six-month program of training to develop, improve, or enhance the occupational skills of persons in their current positions of employment or of persons seeking employment in a new or different occupation; or

Provides an educational program pursuant to a charter from a school district in accordance with applicable laws; or

Provides an educational program to the residents of the state; or

Provides or finances, directly or indirectly through one or more affiliates, an educational program or educational services in this state or outside this state; or

Is any public school district; or

Provides an educational program pursuant to a contract with the state charter school institute in accordance with applicable laws.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1518, § 1, effective May 28, 2004.)

"Educational institution" includes any private foundation, nonprofit association, or any other entity which is organized principally for the support and benefit of any educational institution defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection (8) and includes but is not limited to the Auraria higher education center. Any reference in this article to "educational institution supported in whole or in part by state funds" includes but is not limited to the Auraria higher education center.

(8.5) (a) (I) (A) "Facility", in the case of a participating educational institution, means any structure or building suitable for use as a housing facility, an instructional facility, an administration building, a research facility, a laboratory, a maintenance, storage, or utility facility, an auditorium, a dining hall, a food service and preparation facility, a mental or physical health-care facility, a recreational facility, or a student center facility or any other structure or facility required or useful for the operation of an educational institution, including, but not limited to: Offices, parking lots and garages, and other supporting service structures; any equipment, furnishings, and appurtenances necessary or useful in the operation of a participating educational institution; and the acquisition, preparation, and development of all real and personal property necessary or convenient as a site or sites for any such structure or facility.

"Facility", in the case of a cultural institution, means any property that is suitable for the particular purposes of a cultural institution, including, without limitation, any such property suitable for use as or in connection with the operation of any one or more of the following: An administrative facility, an aquarium, an assembly hall, an auditorium, a botanical garden, an exhibition or performance hall or structure, a gallery, a greenhouse, a library, a museum, a scientific laboratory, a housing facility that serves the cultural needs of its residents and is being financed as part of a multistate program of financing educational or cultural facilities under this article, a theater, or a zoological facility; and also including, without limitation, the books, works of art or music, and the animal, plant, or aquatic life or other items contained therein for display, exhibition, or performance. The term "facility" includes any other structure or facility required or useful for the operation of a cultural institution including, but not limited to, offices, parking lots and garages, and other supporting service structures; any equipment, furnishings, and appurtenances necessary or useful in the operation of a cultural institution; and the acquisition, preparation, and development of all real and personal property necessary or convenient as a site or sites for any such structure or facility. The term "facility" also includes buildings on the national register of historic places which are owned and operated by nonprofit entities.

"Facility", in the case of a cultural institution, also means any property described in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) that is located within the state or outside the state and that is operated or financed by a cultural institution if such institution operating or financing such property, or an affiliate of such institution, also operates or finances a cultural facility within this state.

"Facility" does not include such items as food, fuel, supplies, or other items which are customarily considered as current operating expenses or charges.

(B) "Facility", in the case of a participating educational institution, also means any structure or building described in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) that is located within the state or outside the state and that is operated or financed by an educational institution if such institution operating or financing such structure or building, or an affiliate of such institution, operates or finances an educational facility within this state.

"Refinancing of outstanding obligations" means liquidation, with the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the authority, of any indebtedness of a participating educational institution or cultural institution incurred prior to, on, or after July 1, 1981, to finance or aid in financing a lawful purpose of such institution not financed pursuant to this article which would constitute a facility had it been undertaken and financed by the authority. The term also means consolidation of such indebtedness with indebtedness of the authority incurred for a facility related to the purpose for which the indebtedness of such institution was initially incurred.

"Revenues" means, with respect to facilities, the rents, fees, charges, interest, principal repayments, and other income received or to be received by the authority from any source on account of such facilities.

"Zero-coupon" means any obligation, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, which is payable in one payment on a fixed date.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1096, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(8)(a)(III) amended and (8)(c) added, p. 804, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 85:

(8)(a)(III) and (8)(c) amended and (8)(a)(IV) added, p. 786, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 88:

(11) added, p. 849, § 2, effective April 20.

L. 89:

(6.3) added and (7)(a) and (9) amended, p. 986, § 2, effective April 8; (3) and (11) amended and (6.5) added, p. 982, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 98:

(1), (7)(a)(I), (8), and (9) amended, p. 601, § 3, effective May 4.

L. 2000:

(6.3), (7)(a), and IP (8)(a) amended and (8)(a)(VII) added, p. 404, § 2, effective April 13.

L. 2002:

(8)(a)(VIII) added, p. 1744, § 16, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(6.3)(c), (7)(b), and (8)(b) amended, p. 2055, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 2004:

(6.3)(a), (7)(a)(II)(A), and (8)(b) amended, p. 1518, § 1, effective May 28; (8)(a)(VIII) amended and (8)(a)(IX) added, p. 1648, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(7) amended and (8.5) added, p. 1496, § 31, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(8)(a)(VIII) amended, p. 1066, § 11, effective May 22.

23-15-104. Authority - creation - board - organization.

There is created an independent public body politic and corporate to be known as the Colorado educational and cultural facilities authority. The authority is constituted a public instrumentality, and its exercise of the powers conferred by this article 15 is deemed and held to be the performance of an essential public function. The authority is a body corporate and a political subdivision of the state, is not an agency of state government, and is not subject to administrative direction by any department, commission, board, or agency of the state.

The legal effects of any statute designating the Colorado educational and cultural facilities authority by any other name, or property rights incurred under any other name, shall not be impaired.

The governing body of the authority is a board of directors, which consists of seven members to be appointed by the governor, with the consent of the senate.

Each member must be a resident of the state.

No more than four of the members may be affiliated with the same political party.

The term of office of an appointed member is four years; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than four members' terms expire in the same year.

Each member shall serve until the member's resignation or, in the case of a member whose term has expired, until the member's successor has been appointed.

Any member is eligible for reappointment.

The governor shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term. Any member appointed by the governor when the general assembly is not in regular session, whether appointed for an unexpired term or for a full term, shall be deemed to be duly appointed and qualified until the appointment of such member is approved or rejected by the senate. Such appointment shall be submitted to the senate for its approval or rejection during the next regular session of the general assembly following the appointment.

Any member of the board may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, willful neglect of duty, or other cause.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4)(a) of this section, a member shall be removed by the governor if such member fails, for reasons other than temporary mental or physical disability or illness, to attend three regular meetings of the board during any twelve-month period without the board having entered upon its minutes an approval for any of such absences.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 804, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 907, § 15, effective June 15.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 605, § 5, effective May 4.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 30, § 39, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For limitation on issuance of private activity bonds, see part 17 of article 32 of title 24; for the provisions that designate the Colorado postsecondary educational facilities authority as a "special purpose authority" for the purposes of section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution, see § 24-77-102 (15).

23-15-105. Organizational meeting - chairman - executive director - surety bond - conflict of interest.

A member of the board, designated by the governor, shall call and convene the initial organizational meeting of the board and shall serve as its chairman pro tempore. At such meeting, appropriate bylaws shall be presented for adoption. The bylaws may provide for the election or appointment of officers, the delegation of certain powers and duties, and such other matters as the authority deems proper. At such meeting and annually thereafter, the board shall elect one of its members as chairman and one as vice-chairman. It shall appoint an executive director and, if desired, an associate executive director, who shall not be members of the board and who shall serve at its pleasure. They shall receive such compensation for their services as shall be fixed by the board.

The executive director, the associate executive director, or any other person designated by the board shall keep a record of the proceedings thereof and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the board, the minute books or journal thereof, and its official seal. Said executive director, associate executive director, or other person may cause copies of all minutes and other records and documents of the board to be made and may give certificates under the official seal of the authority to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely on such certificates.

The board may delegate, by resolution, to one or more of its members or to its executive director or associate executive director such powers and duties as it may deem proper.

Before the issuance of any bonds under this article, the executive director and associate executive director shall each execute a surety bond in the penal sum of one hundred thousand dollars, and each member of the board shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars, or, in lieu thereof, the chairman of the board shall execute a blanket bond covering each member, the executive director, the associate executive director, and the employees or other officers of the authority, each surety bond to be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office or offices covered, to be executed by a surety authorized to transact business in this state as surety. The cost of each such bond shall be paid by the authority.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, it shall not constitute a conflict of interest for a trustee, director, officer, or employee of any educational institution, financial institution, investment banking firm, brokerage firm, commercial bank or trust company, architectural firm, or other firm, person, or corporation to serve as a member of the board; except that such trustee, director, officer, or employee shall disclose such interest to the board and may abstain from deliberation, action, and voting by the board in each instance where the business affiliation of any such trustee, director, officer, or employee is involved.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1099, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(5) amended, p. 605, § 6, effective May 4.

23-15-106. Meetings of board - quorum - expenses.

Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising its powers. Action may be taken by the board upon the affirmative vote of at least four of its members. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the board.

Each meeting of the board for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public. Notice of meetings shall be as provided in the bylaws of the authority. Resolutions need not be published or posted, but resolutions and all proceedings and other acts of the board shall be a public record.

Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling and lodging expenses, incurred in the discharge of their official duties. Any payments for compensation and expenses shall be paid from funds of the authority.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1100, § 1, effective July 1.

23-15-107. General powers of the authority.

In addition to any other powers granted to the authority by this article 15, the authority shall have the following powers:

To have perpetual existence and succession as a body politic and corporate;

To adopt and from time to time amend or repeal bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business, consistent with the provisions of this article;

To sue and be sued;

To have and to use a seal and to alter the same at pleasure;

To maintain an office at such place or places as it may designate;

To determine, in accordance with the provisions of this article, the location and character of any facility to be financed under the provisions of this article and to acquire, construct, reconstruct, renovate, improve, alter, replace, maintain, repair, operate, and lease such facility as lessee or lessor; to enter into contracts for any and all of such purposes and for the management and operation of a facility; and to designate a participating educational institution or cultural institution as its agent to determine the location and character of a facility undertaken by such participating institution under the provisions of this article and, as agent of the authority, to acquire, construct, reconstruct, renovate, replace, alter, improve, maintain, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, and regulate the same and to enter into contracts for any and all of such purposes including contracts for the management and operation of such facility;

To enter into an agreement with a participating institution of postsecondary education or cultural institution covering any or all of the facilities upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall deem proper, including, but not limited to, renewable, one-year leases with institutions of postsecondary education supported in whole or in part by state funds if authorized pursuant to section 23-1-106 or section 24-82-709, or a financed purchase of an asset or certificate of participation agreement authorized pursuant to sections 24-82-102 (1)(b) and 24-82-801; to charge and collect rent therefor and to terminate any such agreement upon the failure of the buyer to comply with any of the obligations thereof; and to include in any such agreement, if desired, provisions that the buyer thereof shall have options to renew the term of the agreement for such period or periods, at such rent, and upon such terms or conditions as shall be determined by the authority or to purchase any or all of the facilities or to include, if desired, provisions that, upon payment of all of the indebtedness incurred by the authority for the financing of such facilities, the authority will convey any or all of the facilities to the buyer or buyers thereof with or without consideration;

To borrow money and to issue bonds, notes, bond anticipation notes, or other obligations for any of its corporate purposes and to fund or refund the same, all as provided for in this article;

To establish rules and regulations, and to designate a participating educational institution or cultural institution as its agent to establish such rules and regulations, for the use of the facilities undertaken or operated by such participating institution and to employ or contract for consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, accountants, construction and financial experts, superintendents, managers, and such other employees and agents as may be necessary in its judgment and to fix their compensation;

To receive and accept from the federal government or any other public agency loans, grants, or contributions for or in aid of the construction of facilities or any portion thereof, or for equipping the same, and to receive and accept grants, gifts, or other contributions from any source, but only for the purposes for which they were loaned, contributed, or granted;

To mortgage or pledge all or any portion of the facilities and the site or sites thereof, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, for the benefit of the holders of bonds issued to finance such facilities or any portion thereof;

To make mortgage loans or other secured or unsecured loans to any participating educational institution or cultural institution for the cost of the facilities in accordance with an agreement between the authority and such participating institution; but no such loan shall exceed the total cost of such facilities as determined by such participating institution and approved by the authority;

To make mortgage loans or other secured or unsecured loans to a participating educational institution or cultural institution; to refund outstanding obligations, mortgages, or advances issued, made, or given by such participating institution for the cost of its facilities, including the issuance of bonds and the making of loans to a participating educational institution or cultural institution; or to refinance outstanding obligations and indebtedness incurred for facilities when the authority finds that such financing is in the public interest and alleviates the financial hardship upon the participating educational institution or cultural institution or is in connection with other financing by the authority for such participating institution;

To obtain or aid in obtaining, from any department or agency of the United States or of this state or any private company, any insurance or guarantee as to, or of, or for the payment or repayment of the interest or principal, or both the interest and principal, or any part of either or both on any loan, lease, or obligation or any instrument evidencing or securing the same made or entered into pursuant to the provisions of this article and, notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, to enter into any agreement, contract, or other instrument whatsoever with respect to any such insurance or guarantee, to accept payment in such manner and form as provided therein in the event of default by a participating educational institution or cultural institution, and to assign any such insurance or guarantee as security for the authority's bonds;

To charge to and equitably apportion among participating educational institutions or cultural institutions the administrative costs and expenses of the authority incurred in the exercise of the powers granted and the duties conferred by this article;

To make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the exercise of its powers and functions under this article;

To do all other things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes of this article;

To make mortgage loans or other secured or unsecured loans to any person for the costs of a facility which will be made available for use by an educational institution or a cultural institution, if the governing body of such institution has resolved that the use of such facility will be in the best interests of such institution; but no such loan shall exceed the total cost of said facility as determined by said institution and approved by the authority;

To refund or refinance, through the issuance of bonds and the making of loans, any outstanding obligations, mortgages, indebtednesses, or advances issued, made, or given by a person for the cost of facilities which will be made available for use by an educational institution or a cultural institution when the governing board of such institution finds that the use of said facility is in the best interests of said institution;

To administer the Colorado education savings program pursuant to the provisions of section 23-15-110.5;

To designate bonds or certificates of participation of the authority as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates pursuant to the provisions of section 23-15-110.5;

To designate as Colorado education savings bonds or certificates the bonds or certificates of participation of issuers other than the authority if the issuer has applied for such designation and the authority has determined that such instruments satisfy the criteria established in section 23-15-110.5 (2).

The authority shall not have the power to operate a facility as a business other than as a lessee or lessor.

No institution of postsecondary education supported in whole or in part by state funds shall contract or otherwise agree with the authority to issue bonds on its behalf unless all approvals required by law, including but not limited to approvals required pursuant to section 23-1-106 and section 24-82-709, C.R.S., have been obtained.

Repealed.

No mortgage loan, other secured or unsecured loan, or financing, refinancing, refunding, or other financial obligation incurred pursuant to the terms of this article for the benefit of a charter school as described in section 23-15-103 (8)(a)(V), shall obligate, directly or indirectly, the school district that granted the charter to the charter school unless:

The express written consent of the school district is obtained; and

The authority obtains a written opinion of legal counsel that the obligation of the school district is legally permissible under the Colorado constitution and all applicable laws.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1100, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(r) and (1)(s) added and (3) amended, p. 805, §§ 3, 4, effective May 25.

L. 84:

(3) amended, p. 636, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 85:

(1)(g) and (2) amended, p. 786, § 2, effective April 12.

L. 89:

(1)(f), (1)(g), (1)(i), (1)(l) to (1)(o), (1)(r), (1)(s), (2), and (3) amended and (4) added, pp. 988, 990, §§ 3, 4, effective April 8; (1)(t) to (1)(v) added, p. 983, § 3, effective April 12.

L. 92:

(4) repealed, p. 585, § 1, effective March 19.

L. 98:

(1)(f), (1)(i), (1)(l) to (1)(o), (1)(r), and (1)(s) amended and (5) added, p. 603, § 4, effective May 4.

L. 2003:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1377, § 6, effective April 28.

L. 2009:

(1)(g) amended, (HB 09-1218), ch. 132, p. 574, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1) and (1)(g) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2019, § 25, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending subsection (1)(g), see section 1 of chapter 190, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

23-15-108. Acquisition of property.

The authority, directly or by or through a participating educational institution or cultural institution as its agent, may acquire by purchase, lease, gift, devise, or other means such lands, structures, real or personal property, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including lands lying under water and riparian rights which are located within or without the state, as it may deem necessary or convenient for the construction, acquisition, or operation of facilities, upon such terms as may be considered by the authority to be reasonable, and may take title thereto in the name of the authority or in the name of such participating educational institution or cultural institution as its agent.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 990, § 5, effective April 8.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 605, § 7, effective May 4.

23-15-109. Notes.

The authority may issue from time to time its negotiable notes for any corporate purpose, including the payment of all or any part of the cost of any facility, and may renew from time to time any notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes partly to renew notes or to discharge other obligations then outstanding and partly for some other purpose. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue thereof, and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. All such notes shall be payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or from the revenues of the authority or other moneys available therefor and not otherwise pledged, subject only to any contractual rights of the holders of any of its notes or other obligations then outstanding.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire article added, p. 1102, § 1, effective July 1.